Washington statutes.
RCW 4.56.075

Judgment in case of setoff—When exceeds plaintiff's debt or affirmative relief required.

If a setoff established at the trial, exceeds the plaintiff's demand so established, judgment for the defendant shall be given for the excess; or if it appears that the defendant is entitled to any affirmative relief, judgment shall be given accordingly.

[Code 1881 s 303; 1877 p 62 s 307; 1869 p 74 s 305; 1854 p 173 s 231; RRS s 433. Formerly RCW 4.56.070, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 54(b).